North Carolina, session 2025, HB743.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Service Regulation (DHSR), shall adopt rules necessary to allow direct support professionals
providing services to a client being served in a facility licensed under 10A NCAC 27G
.5601(c)(3) to permanently reside in that facility.
SECTION 2. DHSR shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Health and Human Services by September 30, 2025, on its progress toward implementing the
changes under this act. This report shall include any requested legislative changes.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H743-v-1*